North Dakota statutes. TITLE 38 Mining and Gas and Oil Production
CHAPTER 38-08 Control of Gas and Oil Resources
38-08-09.8.
Modification of property rights, leases, and contracts — Title to property — Distribution of proceeds — Effect of operations.

Property rights, leases, contracts, and all other rights and obligations must be regarded as amended and modified to the extent necessary to conform to the provisions and requirements of sections 38-08-09.1 through 38-08-09.16 and to any valid and applicable plan of unitization or order of the commission made and adopted pursuant hereto, but otherwise to remain in full force and effect.

Nothing contained in sections 38-08-09.1 through 38-08-09.16 may be construed to require a transfer to or vesting in the unit of title to the separately owned tracts or leases thereon within the unit area, other than the right to use and operate the same to the extent set out in the plan of unitization; nor may the unit be regarded as owning the unit production. The unit production and the proceeds from the sale thereof are owned by the several persons to whom the same is allocated under the plan of unitization. All property, whether real or personal, which the unit may in any way acquire, hold, or possess may not be acquired, held, or possessed by the unit for its own account but must be so acquired, held, and possessed by the unit for the account and as agent of the several lessees and is the property of such lessees as their interests may appear under the plan of unitization, subject, however, to the right of the unit to the possession, management, use, or disposal of the same in the proper conduct of its affairs.

The amount of the unit production allocated to each separately owned tract within the unit, and only that amount, regardless of the well or wells in the unit area from which it may be produced, and regardless of whether it be more or less than the amount of the production from the well or wells, if any, on any such separately owned tract, must for all intents, uses, and purposes be regarded and considered as production from such separately owned tract, and, except as may be otherwise authorized in sections 38-08-09.1 through 38-08-09.16, or in the plan of unitization approved by the commission, must be distributed among or the proceeds thereof paid to the several persons entitled to share in the production from such separately owned tract in the same manner, in the same proportions, and upon the same conditions that they would have participated and shared in the production or proceeds thereof from such separately owned tract had not said unit been organized, and with the same legal force and effect. If adequate provisions are made for the receipt thereof, the share of the unit production allocated to each separately owned tract must be delivered in kind to the persons entitled thereto by virtue of ownership of oil and gas rights therein or by purchase from such owners subject to the rights of the unit to withhold and sell the same in payment of unit expense pursuant to the plan of unitization, and subject further to the call of the unit on such proportions of the gas for operating purposes as may be provided in the plan of unitization.

Operations carried on under and in accordance with the plan of unitization must be regarded and considered as a fulfillment of and compliance with all of the provisions, covenants, and conditions, express or implied, of the several oil and gas mining leases upon lands included within the unit area, or other contracts pertaining to the development thereof, insofar as said leases or other contracts may relate to the common source of supply or portion thereof included in the unit area. Wells drilled or operated on any part of the unit area no matter where located must for all purposes be regarded as wells drilled on each separately owned tract within such unit area.

Nothing herein or in any plan of unitization may be construed as increasing or decreasing the express or implied covenants of a lease in respect to a unit source of supply or lands not included within the unit area of a unit. However, when an oil and gas lease covers and affects lands partially within and partially without the unit area, unit operations and unit production allocated to the lease, as provided in this section, may not be deemed operations on or production from the lease as to the lands covered by the lease lying outside the unit area after two years from the effective date of the order of the commission creating and approving the unit or the expiration of the primary term of the lease, whichever is the later date. After the later date, the lease as to lands outside the unit area may be maintained in force and effect only in accordance with the terms and provisions contained in the lease.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 260, § 8; 1983, ch. 402, § 2.

38-08-09.9.
Enlargement of area — Creation of new units — Amendment of plan.

The unit area of a unit may be enlarged at any time by the commission, subject to the limitations provided in this chapter to include adjoining portions of the same common source of supply, including the unit area of another unit, and a new unit created for the unitized management, operation, and further development of the enlarged unit area, or the plan of unitization may be otherwise amended, all in the same manner, upon the same conditions and subject to the same limitations as provided with respect to the creation of a unit in the first instance, except, that where an amendment to a plan of unitization relates only to the rights and obligations as between lessees, or the amendment to a plan of unitization or the enlargement of a unit area is found by the commission to be reasonably necessary in order to effectively carry on the joint effort, to prevent waste, and to protect correlative rights, and that such will result in the general advantage of the owners of the oil and gas rights within the unit area and the proposed enlarged unit area, and the persons and owners in the proposed added unit area have ratified or approved the plan of unitization as required by section 38-08-09.5, then the amendment to a plan of unitization or the enlargement of a unit area need not be ratified or approved by royalty owners of record in the existing unit area provided that written notice thereof is mailed to the royalty owners by the operator of a unit not more than forty days nor less than thirty days prior to the commission hearing. The notice must describe the plan for the unit amendment or enlargement together with the participation factor to be given each tract in the unit area and in the proposed area and must contain the time and place of the commission hearing. An affidavit of mailing verifying the notice must be filed with the commission. The notice must further provide that in the event ten percent of the royalty interests or working interests in the existing unit area file with the commission at least ten days prior to the commission proceeding an objection to the plan of enlargement, the commission shall require that the unit amendment or enlargement be approved by more than fifty-five percent of all royalty interests and working interests in the existing and proposed areas.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 260, § 9; 1977, ch. 320, § 1; 1991, ch. 389, § 2; 2003, ch. 48, § 29; 2017, ch. 253, § 3, effective August 1, 2017.

38-08-09.10.
Reasonableness of plan.

A plan of unitization may not be considered fair and reasonable if it contains a provision for operating charges which include any part of district or central office expenses other than reasonable overhead charges.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 260, § 10.

38-08-09.11.
Participating by public lands.

The proper board or officer of the state having the control and management of state land, and the proper board or officer of any political, municipal, or other subdivision or agency of the state, are hereby authorized and have the power on behalf of the state or of such political, municipal, or other subdivision or agency thereof, with respect to land or oil and gas rights, subject to the control and management of such respective body, board, or officer, to consent to or participate in any plan or program of unitization adopted pursuant to sections 38-08-09.1 through 38-08-09.16.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 260, § 11.

38-08-09.12.
Receipts as income.

Neither the unit production, nor proceeds from the sale thereof, nor other receipts may be treated, regarded, or taxed as income or profits of the unit; but instead, all such receipts are the income of the several persons to whom or to whose credit the same are payable under the plan of unitization. To the extent the unit may receive or disburse said receipts, it shall only do so as a common administrative agent of the persons to whom the same are payable.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 260, § 12.

38-08-09.13.
Definitions.

For the purposes of sections 38-08-09.1 through 38-08-09.16, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Lessee” refers not only to lessees under oil and gas leases but also includes owners of unleased mineral rights having the right to develop the same for oil and gas to the extent of a seven-eighths interest.

“Oil and gas” refers not only to oil and gas as such in combination one with the other, but shall have general reference to oil, gas, casinghead gas, casinghead gasoline, gas-distillate, or other hydrocarbons, or any combination or combinations thereof, which may be found in or produced from a common source of supply of oil, oil and gas, or gas-distillate.

“Person” means and includes any individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, common-law or statutory trust, association of any kind, the state of North Dakota, or any subdivision or agency thereof acting in a proprietary capacity, guardian, executor, administrator, fiduciary of any kind, or any other entity or being capable of owning an interest in and to a unit source of supply of oil and gas.

“Unit expense” includes and means any and all cost and expense in the conduct and management of its affairs or the operations carried on by it.

Any reference to a separately owned tract, although in general terms broad enough to include the surface and all underlying common sources of supply of oil and gas, shall have reference thereto only in relation to the unit source of supply or portion thereof embraced within the unit area of a particular unit.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 260, § 13; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

38-08-09.14.
Severability of provisions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 82, § 154.

38-08-09.15.
Agreement not violative of laws governing monopolies or restraint of trade.

No agreement between or among lessees or other owners of oil and gas rights in oil and gas properties, entered into pursuant hereto or with a view or for the purpose of bringing about the unitized development or operation of such properties, may be held to violate any of the statutes of this state prohibiting monopolies or acts, arrangements, agreements, contracts, combinations, or conspiracies in restraint of trade or commerce.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 260, § 15.

38-08-09.16.
Appeals.

Any person adversely affected by an order of the commission made under sections 38-08-09.1 through 38-08-09.16 may appeal from such order to the district court of the county in which the land or a part thereof involved in the unit lies, in the manner provided in section 38-08-14.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 260, § 16.

38-08-09.17.
Unit of more than one pool — Unit source of supply.

The commission upon its own motion may, and upon petition of any interested person shall, after notice therefor, hold a hearing to consider the need for the operation as a unit of two or more pools or parts thereof separated vertically in one field, and has the power to create such a unit and provide for the unitization and unitized operation of the unit source of supply. “Unit source of supply” means those pools or parts thereof to be produced by such unit operation as designated by order of the industrial commission. The petition, the hearing, the commission’s findings and order, and all other matters must be in the form and manner and in accordance with the procedure and requirements hereinabove set forth in sections 38-08-09.1 through 38-08-09.16; provided, however, whenever and wherever the words “common source of supply” appear in said sections, the words “unit source of supply” must be substituted in lieu thereof and all other provisions of the sections shall otherwise apply.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 349, § 1.

38-08-10.
Development and operating costs of integrated fractional tracts.

A person to whom another is indebted for expenses incurred in drilling and operating a well on a drilling unit required to be formed as provided for in section 38-08-08, may, in order to secure payment of the amount due, fix a lien upon the interest of the debtor in the production from the drilling unit or the unit area, as the case may be, by filing for record, with the recorder of the county where the property involved, or any part thereof, is located, an affidavit setting forth the amount due and the interest of the debtor in such production. The person to whom the amount is payable may, at the expense of the debtor, store all or any part of the production upon which the lien exists until the total amount due, including reasonable storage charges, is paid or the commodity is sold at foreclosure sale and delivery is made to the purchaser. The lien may be foreclosed as provided for with respect to foreclosure of a lien on chattels.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 227, § 11; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 38-0810; S.L. 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

38-08-11.
Rules covering practice before commission.

The commission may adopt rules governing the practice and procedure before the commission, which rules must be adopted pursuant to the provisions of chapter 28-32.

When an emergency requiring immediate action is found to exist, the commission may issue an emergency order without notice or hearing, reciting the existence of the emergency and requiring that necessary action be taken to meet the emergency, which order is effective upon issuance. No emergency order may remain in effect for more than forty days.

Any notice required by this chapter must be given at the election of the commission either in accordance with chapter 28-32 or by one publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the state capital and in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the land affected, or some part thereof, is situated. The notice must issue in the name of the state, must be signed by the chairman or secretary of the commission, and must specify the style and number of the proceeding, the time and place of the hearing, and must briefly state the purpose of the proceeding. Should the commission elect to give notice by personal service, such service may be made by any officer authorized to serve process, or by any agent of the commission, in the same manner as is provided by law for the service of summons in civil actions in the courts of the state. Proof of the service by such agent must be by the affidavit of the person making personal service. In proceedings that do not involve a complaint and a specifically named respondent, including agency hearings on applications seeking some right or authorization from the commission, the notice of hearing must be given at least fifteen days before the hearing, except in cases of emergency.

The commission may act upon its own motion or upon the petition of any interested person. On the filing of a petition concerning any matter within the jurisdiction of the commission, the commission shall fix a date for a hearing and give notice. Upon the filing of a petition of any interested party, the commission shall enter and serve its order upon all parties to the proceeding as required in section 28-32-39.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 227, § 12; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 38-0811; S.L. 1963, ch. 263, § 3; 1979, ch. 395, § 1; 1991, ch. 342, § 33; 1995, ch. 357, § 1; 2021, ch. 275, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

38-08-12.
Commission has power to summon witnesses, administer oaths, and to require production of records.

The commission has the power to summon witnesses, to administer oaths, and to require the production of records, books, and documents for examination at any hearing or investigation conducted by it. No person may be excused from attending and testifying, or from producing books, papers, and records before the commission or a court, or from obedience to the subpoena of the commission or a court, on the ground or for the reason that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of the person may tend to incriminate the person or subject the person to a penalty or forfeiture; provided, that nothing herein contained may be construed as requiring any person to produce any books, papers, or records, or to testify in response to any inquiry not pertinent to some question lawfully before such commission or court for determination. No natural person may be subjected to criminal prosecution or to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which, in spite of the person’s objection, the person may be required to testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, before the commission or court, or in obedience to its subpoena; provided, that no person testifying may be exempted from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in so testifying.

In case of failure or refusal on the part of any person to comply with the subpoena issued by the commission, or in case of the refusal of any witness to testify as to any matter regarding which the person may be interrogated, any court in the state, upon the application of the commission, may in termtime or vacation issue an attachment for such person and compel the person to comply with such subpoena, and to attend before the commission and produce such records, books, and documents for examination, and to give the person’s testimony. Such court has the power to punish for contempt as in the case of disobedience to a like subpoena issued by the court, or for refusal to testify therein.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 227, § 13; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 38-0812.

Cross-References.

Compelling attendance of witnesses, see N.D.C.C. ch. 31-03.

Contempt, see N.D.C.C. § 27-10-01.1 et seq.; N.D.R.Civ.P. 45(e).

Oaths, officers authorized to administer, see N.D.C.C. § 44-05-01.

38-08-13.
Party adversely affected may apply for reconsideration.

Any party adversely affected by any order of the commission may file a written petition for reconsideration in accordance with section 28-32-40. The commission shall grant or deny any such petition in whole or in part in accordance with the provisions of section 28-32-40 and rules adopted pursuant to it.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 227, § 14; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 38-0813; S.L. 1961, ch. 252, § 1; 1987, ch. 425, § 1; 1991, ch. 342, § 34; 2001, ch. 293, § 14; 2005, ch. 318, § 1.

38-08-14.
Party adversely affected may appeal to district court.

Any party adversely affected by an order entered by the commission may appeal, pursuant to chapter 28-32, from the order to the district court for the county in which the oil or gas well or the affected property is located. However, if the oil or gas well or the property affected by the order is located in or underlies more than one county, any appeal may be taken to the district court for any county in or under which any part of the affected property is located.

At the time of filing of the notice of appeal, if an application for the suspension of the order is filed, the commission may enter an order suspending the order complained of and fixing the amount of a supersedeas bond. Within ten days after the entry of an order by the commission which suspends the order complained of and fixes the amount of the bond, the appellant shall file with the commission a supersedeas bond in the required amount and with proper surety. Upon approval of the bond, the order of the commission suspending the order complained of is effective until its final disposition upon appeal. The bond must run in favor of the commission for the use and benefit of any person who may suffer damage by reason of the suspension of the order in the event the same is affirmed by the district court. If the order of the commission is not superseded, it must continue in force and effect as if no appeal was pending, unless a stay is ordered by the court to which the appeal is taken under section 28-32-48.

Orders of the commission must be sustained by the district court if the commission has regularly pursued its authority and its findings and conclusions are sustained by the law and by substantial and credible evidence.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 227, § 15; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 38-0814; S.L. 1963, ch. 263, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 402, § 1; 1987, ch. 426, § 1; 1987, ch. 427, § 1; 1991, ch. 342, § 35; 2001, ch. 293, § 15; 2005, ch. 318, § 2.

38-08-15.
Acquisition and handling illegal oil and gas prohibited — Seizure of illegal oil and gas and sale thereof.

The sale, purchase, acquisition, transportation, refining, processing, or handling of illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product is hereby prohibited. However, no penalty by way of fine may be imposed upon a person who sells, purchases, acquires, transports, refines, processes, or handles illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product unless:

Such person knows, or is put on notice, of facts indicating that illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product is involved; or

Such person fails to obtain a certificate of clearance with respect to such oil, gas, or product where prescribed by order of the commission, or fails to follow any other method prescribed by an order of the commission for the identification of such oil, gas, or product.

Illegal oil, illegal gas, and illegal product are declared to be contraband and are subject to seizure and sale as herein provided; seizure and sale to be in addition to any and all other remedies and penalties provided in this chapter for violations relating to illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product. Whenever the commission believes that any oil, gas, or product is illegal, the commission acting by the attorney general, shall bring a civil action in rem in the district court of the county where such oil, gas, or product is found, to seize and sell the same, or the commission may include such an action in rem for the seizure and sale of illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product in any suit brought for an injunction or penalty involving illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product. Any person claiming an interest in oil, gas, or product affected by any such action in rem has the right to intervene as an interested party in such action.

Actions for the seizure and sale of illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product must be strictly in rem and must proceed in the name of the state as plaintiff against the illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal products as defendant. No bond or similar undertaking may be required of the plaintiff. Upon the filing of the petition for seizure and sale, the attorney general shall issue a summons, with a copy of the complaint attached thereto, which must be served in the manner provided for service in civil actions, upon any and all persons having or claiming any interest in the illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product described in the petition. Service must be completed by the filing of an affidavit by the person making the service, stating the time and manner of making such service. Any person who fails to appear and answer within the period of thirty days is forever barred by the judgment based on such service. The posting of copies of the summons and petition as above provided operates to place the state in constructive possession of the oil, gas, or product described in the petition. In addition, if the court, on a properly verified petition, or affidavits, or oral testimony, finds that grounds for seizure and for sale exist, the court shall issue an immediate order of seizure, describing the oil, gas, or product to be seized and directing the sheriff of the county to take such oil, gas, or product into the sheriff’s custody, actual or constructive, and to hold the same subject to the further order of the court. The court, in such order of seizure, may direct the sheriff to deliver the oil, gas, or product seized by the sheriff under the order to an agent appointed by the court, as the agent of the court; such agent to give bond in an amount and with such surety as the court may direct, conditioned upon the agent’s compliance with the orders of the court concerning the custody and disposition of such oil, gas, or product.

Any person having an interest in oil, gas, or product described in an order of seizure and contesting the right of the state to the seizure and sale thereof may, prior to the sale thereof as herein provided, obtain the release thereof, upon furnishing bond to the sheriff approved by the court, in an amount equal to one hundred fifty percent of the market value of the oil, gas, or product to be released, and conditioned as the court may direct upon redelivery to the sheriff of such product released or upon payment to the sheriff of the market value thereof as the court may direct, if and when ordered by the court, and upon full compliance with the further orders of the court.

If the court, after a hearing upon a petition for the seizure and sale of oil, gas, or product, finds that such oil, gas, or product is contraband, the court shall order the sale thereof by the sheriff in the same manner and upon the same notice of sale as provided by law for the sale of personal property on execution of judgment entered in a civil action, except that the court may order that the illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product be sold in specified lots or portions and at specified intervals. Upon such sale, title to the oil, gas, or product sold vests in the purchaser free of the claims of any and all persons having any title thereto or interest therein at or prior to the seizure thereof, and the same is legal oil, legal gas, or legal product, as the case may be, in the hands of the purchaser.

All proceeds derived from the sale of illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product, as above provided, after payment of costs of suit and expenses incident to the sale must be paid to the state treasurer and credited to the general fund.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 227, § 16; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 38-0815; S.L. 2013, ch. 277, § 5.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 277, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

Note.

Section 11 of chapter 277, S.L. 2013 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act does not apply to the reclamation of an oil or gas-related pipeline or associated facility put into service before August 1, 1983.”

Cross-References.

Service of process, see N.D.R.Civ.P. 4.

38-08-16.
Civil and criminal penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission is subject to a civil penalty to be imposed by the commission not to exceed twelve thousand five hundred dollars for each offense, and each day’s violation is a separate offense, unless the penalty for the violation is otherwise specifically provided for and made exclusive in this chapter. Any such civil penalty may be compromised by the commission. All amounts paid as civil penalties must be deposited in the abandoned oil and gas well plugging and site reclamation fund. The penalties provided in this section, if not paid, are recoverable by suit filed by the attorney general in the name and on behalf of the commission, in the district court of the county in which the defendant resides, or in which any defendant resides, if there be more than one defendant, or in the district court of any county in which the violation occurred. The payment of the penalty may not operate to legalize any illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product involved in the violation for which the penalty is imposed, or to relieve a person on whom the penalty is imposed from liability to any other person for damages arising out of the violation.

Notwithstanding any of the other provisions of this section, a person who willfully violates any provision of this chapter, or any rule or order of the commission that pertains to the prevention or control of pollution or waste is guilty of a class C felony unless the penalty for the violation is otherwise specifically provided for and made exclusive in this chapter. The criminal penalty provided for in this subsection may only be imposed by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 227, § 17; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 38-0816; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 415; 1981, ch. 367, § 1; 1985, ch. 402, § 2; 1989, ch. 437, § 1; 2013, ch. 277, § 6.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 277, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

Note.

Section 11 of chapter 277, S.L. 2013 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act does not apply to the reclamation of an oil or gas-related pipeline or associated facility put into service before August 1, 1983.”

Law Reviews.

North Dakota Law Review: Energy Symposium: Article: Development’s Victim Or Its Beneficiary?: The Impact Of Oil And Gas Development On The Fort Berthold Indian Reservation, 87 N.D. L. Rev. 535 (2011).

38-08-17.
Action to restrain violation or threatened violation.

Whenever it appears that any person is violating or threatening to violate any provision of this chapter, or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission, the commission shall bring suit against such person in the district court of any county where the violation occurs or is threatened, to restrain such person from continuing such violation or from carrying out the threat of violation. In any such suit, the court has jurisdiction to grant to the commission, without bond or other undertaking, such prohibitory and mandatory injunctions as the facts may warrant, including temporary restraining orders, preliminary injunctions, temporary, preliminary or final orders restraining the movement or disposition of any illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product, any of which the court may order to be impounded or placed in the custody of an agent appointed by the court.

If the commission fails to bring suit to enjoin a violation or threatened violation of any provision of this chapter, or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission, within ten days after receipt of written request to do so by any person who is or will be adversely affected by such violation, the person making such request may bring suit in the person’s own behalf to restrain such violation or threatened violation in any court in which the commission might have brought suit. The commission must be made a party defendant in such suit in addition to the person violating or threatening to violate a provision of this chapter, or a rule, regulation, or order of the commission, and the action must proceed and injunctive relief may be granted to the commission without bond in the same manner as if suit had been brought by the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 227, § 18; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 38-0817.

38-08-18.
Existing regulations still in force. [Repealed]

Omitted.

38-08-19.
Common purchasers — Discrimination in purchasing prohibited.

Every person, association of persons, corporation, or limited liability company now engaged or hereafter engaging in the business of purchasing crude petroleum in this state shall be a common purchaser thereof.

Every common purchaser of crude petroleum shall, without discrimination in favor of one producer or royalty owner as against another in the same marketing district as determined by the commission, purchase all oil tendered to it at the wellhead or at its receiving terminal, which has been lawfully produced, provided that no common purchaser may be required to purchase crude petroleum of inferior quality or grade, or which is unsuitable for its operations.

Whenever a common purchaser is unable to purchase all of the oil tendered to it hereunder, it shall purchase ratably from each marketing district, field, pool, or well, with respect to which such tenders are made. As between wells, purchases shall be considered ratable only if such purchases are made in proportion to the allowables which are or would be assigned to such wells under existing commission rules and regulations, and, as between marketing districts or fields or pools, purchases may be considered ratable if such purchases are made in proportion to the sum of the allowables which are or would be assigned to all wells from which tenders are made in each such marketing district or field or pool.

Every common purchaser of crude petroleum is hereby expressly prohibited from discriminating in favor of its own production or that of an affiliate as against that of others, and the oil produced by such common purchaser or by an affiliate of such common purchaser must be treated as that of any other producer for the purposes of ratable taking.

It is unlawful for any common purchaser to discriminate between oil transported from the wellhead to its receiving terminal in favor of one carrier of crude oil as against another, and nothing herein may be construed to prevent any person, association of persons, corporation, or limited liability company from transporting crude oil from wellhead to receiving terminal of said common purchaser from properties in which such person, association of persons, corporation, or limited liability company may own an interest, and such person, association of persons, corporation, or limited liability company may not be deemed to be in the business of purchasing, or of purchasing and selling crude petroleum within the meaning of this section. Nothing herein may be construed to prohibit any common purchaser from requiring that proper and reasonable facilities be erected and maintained at its receiving terminal by any person, association of persons, corporation, or limited liability company transporting crude oil to such terminal, requiring that a surety bond be posted indemnifying said common purchaser from liability for the transporter’s failure to properly account to the owners of crude oil so transported, or posting a just and reasonable handling charge for accepting delivery at its receiving terminal.

The provisions of this section cover the purchase, or purchase and sale of crude petroleum, and that gathering, handling, marketing, and all other charges assessed by a common purchaser against crude oil produced within this state must be just and reasonable. The commission, after notice and hearing as provided in section 38-08-11, may determine the justness and reasonableness of charges on its own motion or upon motion of any interested person.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 330, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

38-08-20.
Commingling of production — Central production facility — Metering of production — Testing of meters.

A producer may not commingle production from two or more oil or gas wells with diverse ownership in a storage facility without prior approval of the commission after notice and opportunity for hearing. If the commingling of production is for the express purpose of separating, metering, holding, and marketing of production, the owner of the wells shall apply to the commission for approval of the proposed commingling of production at a storage facility. If wells producing into a centralized storage facility have diverse ownership, the production from each well must be measured by meters approved and tested by or under the direction of the commission or production must be measured by some other method the commission has approved after notice and opportunity for hearing. If wells producing into a centralized storage facility have common ownership, including the common ownership of the working interest, the common ownership of the royalty ownership, and the common ownership of any overriding royalty owners, the production from each well need not be measured on meters approved by the commission if the owner of the wells demonstrates to the commission that the production from each well can be accurately determined at reasonable intervals by other means.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 403, § 1; 1993, ch. 367, § 2.

38-08-20.1.
Testing upon request of a royalty owner.

Upon request by a royalty owner to test an oil and gas meter or measuring device, the commission shall test the meter or measuring device or contract for the testing by a qualified meter tester who is independent of any operator or purchaser of production from the metered well.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 367, § 3.

38-08-21.
Regulation of carbon dioxide and nitrogen gas.

The commission is vested with the authority and duty to regulate the exploration, development, and production of carbon dioxide, coal bed methane gas, helium gas, and nitrogen gas within the state, in the same manner, insofar as is practicable, as it regulates oil or gas as defined in this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 428, § 1; 2001, ch. 325, § 3.

38-08-22.
Regulation of welders by oil and gas division of industrial commission — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 358, § 1.

38-08-23.
Plats.

Any person reclaiming a drilling pit or reserve pit after the completion of oil and gas drilling operations shall record an accurate plat certified by a registered surveyor showing the location of the well and notice that an abandoned drilling pit or reserve pit may be on the location within six months of the completion of the reclamation with the recorder of the county in which the drilling pit or reserve pit is located. A plat filed for record in accordance with this section may be recorded without acknowledgment or further proof as required by chapter 47-19 and without the auditor’s certificate referred to in section 11-18-02.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 356, § 2; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2013, ch. 277, § 7.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 7 of chapter 277, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

Note.

Section 11 of chapter 277, S.L. 2013 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act does not apply to the reclamation of an oil or gas-related pipeline or associated facility put into service before August 1, 1983.”

38-08-24.
Carbon sequestration and storage projects — Priority. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 318, § 2.